Utah statutes.
61-2b-37.   Division service fees -- Federal registry fees.
(1)  The division, with the concurrence of the board, shall establish and
collect fees in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for its services under this
chapter.
(2)  The division shall collect the annual registry fee established by the
Federal Financial Institutions Examinations Council from those certificate
holders who seek to perform appraisals in federally related transactions.  The
division shall transmit the fees to the federal Appraisal Subcommittee at
least annually.
